en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Lingerie: Babydolls; Bodysuits; Bra Accessories; Bras; Camisoles; Corsets & Bustiers; Hosiery; Jock Straps; Lingerie Accessories; Lingerie Sets; Petticoats & Pettipants; Shapewear; Women's Underpants; Women's Undershirts; Women's Underwear Slips
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Kadın İç Çamaşırları: Babydoll gecelikler; Bodysuit; Sütyen Aksesuarları; Sütyenler; Kamisol; Korseler ve büstiyerler; Kadın Çorapları; Suspansuarlar; Kadın İç Çamaşırı Aksesuarları; İç çamaşırı setleri; İç Etekler ve Elbise Altına Giyilen Slipler; Şekillendirici Kıyafetler; Kadın Külotları; Kadın Fanilaları; Kadın İç Giyim Slipleri
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Spodná bielizeň: Babydolly; Body; Doplnky k podprsenkám; Podprsenky; Košieľky; Korzety a podprsenky bustier; Pančuchový tovar; Otvorené slipy; Doplnky k spodnej bielizni; Súpravy spodnej bielizne; Spodničky; Sťahovacia bielizeň; Dámske spodky; Dámske tielka; Dámske spodničky
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 란제리: 베이비돌; 바디수트; 브래지어 액세서리; 브래지어; 캐미솔; 코르셋 및 뷔스티에; 양말류; 국부 보호대; 란제리 액세서리; 란제리 세트; 속치마/속바지; 보정 속옷; 여성용 속옷 바지; 여성용 언더 상의; 여성용 속옷 슬립
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Underkläder: Babydolls; Body; Bh-tillbehör; Bh; Camisoler; Korsetter och bustierer; Strumpor och trikåer; Suspensoar; Tillbehör till damunderkläder; Underklädesset; Underkjolar och underbyxor; Formgivande plagg; Underkläder för kvinnor; Undertröjor för kvinnor; Trosor för kvinnor
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Lencería: Babydolls; Bodis; Accesorios para sujetadores; Sujetadores; Camisolas; Corsés y bustiers; Medias; Suspensorios; Accesorios de lencería; Conjuntos de lencería; Enaguas y pololos; Fajas reductoras; Calzones para mujeres; Camisetas interiores para mujeres; Bragas de ropa interior de mujer
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Spodnje perilo: Babydoll; Bodiji; Dodatki za nedrčke; Nedrčki; Spalne srajčke; Stezniki in bustierji; Hlačne nogavice; Suspenzorji; Dodatki za spodnje perilo; Kompleti spodnjega perila; Krinoline in podkrila; Oblačila za oblikovanje postave; Ženske spodnje hlače; Ženske spodnje majice; Ženska spodnja krila
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Alusasut: Babydollit; Bodyt; Rintaliivien lisätarvikkeet; Rintaliivit; Narutopit; Korsetit ja bustierit; Sukkatuotteet; Alasuojat; Alusasujen lisätarkkeet; Alusasusetit; Alushameet ja -housut; Muotoilevat alusasut; Naisten alushousut; Naisten aluspaidat; Naisten lahkeettomat alushousut
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Женское белье: Беби-доллы; Боди; Аксессуары для бюстгальтера; Бюстгальтеры; Майки; Корсеты и бюстье; Чулки; Джоки; Аксессуары для женского белья; Комплекты нижнего белья; Подъюбники и панталоны; Корректирующее белье; Женские трусы; Женские майки; Женские трусы-слипы
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Lingerie: Babydolls; Bodies; Acessórios de sutiã; Sutiãs; Tops de alças; Espartilhos e bustiês; Meias-calças; Coquilhas; Acessórios de lingerie; Conjuntos de lingerie; Petticoats e Pettipants; Vestuário modelador; Cuecas de senhora; Camisolas interiores de senhora; Slips de senhora
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Dessous: Babydolls; Bodys; BH-Zubehör; Büstenhalter; Unterhemden; Korsetts & Bustiers; Strumpfhosen; Suspensorien; Dessous-Accessoires; Dessous-Sets; Petticoats & Rüschenhöschen; Shapewear; Unterhosen für Damen; Unterhemden für Damen; Unterwäsche-Slips für Damen
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Dameundertøy: Babydolls; Bodysuits; BH-tilbehør; BH; Undertrøye; Korsetter og bustierer; Strømper; Jockstraper; Undertøystilbehør; Undertøyssett; Underskjørt og undershorts; Shapewear; Underbukser for kvinner; Underskjorter for kvinner; Underkjoler for kvinner
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Dámské prádlo: Košilky babydoll; Body; Příslušenství k podprsenkám; Podprsenky; Tílka; Korzety a bustýry; Punčochové zboží; Suspenzory; Doplňky k dámskému prádlu; Soupravy spodního prádla; Spodničky a kalhotové spodničky; Tvarovací prádlo; Dámské spodky; Dámská spodní trička; Dámské kombiné
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Đồ lót phụ nữ: Váy ngủ babydoll; Áo liền quần; Phụ kiện áo ngực; Áo ngực; Áo hai dây; Áo corset và áo cúp ngực; Dệt kim; Quần lót dây; Phụ kiện đồ lót; Bộ đồ lót; Tùng lót váy & quần mặc trong váy; Quần áo lót; Quần lót dành cho nữ; Áo lót dành cho nữ; Quần sịp dành cho nữ
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 女式内衣: 娃娃装睡衣; 连体衣; 文胸配件; 文胸; 背心式内衣; 紧身胸衣和半身胸衣; 连裤袜/长袜/打底裤; 护身三角绷带内裤; 女式内衣配饰; 内衣套装; 衬裙和衬裤; 塑身内衣; 女士内裤; 女式汗衫; 女士内衣衬裙
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Lingerie: Babydolls; Bodyer; Tilbehør til bh; Bh'er; Camisoler; Korsetter og bustierer; Trikotage; Skridtbind; Tilbehør til lingerie; Lingerisæt; Underskørter og underkjoler; Shapewear; Underbukser til kvinder; Undertrøjer til kvinder; Underkjoler til kvinder
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Lenjerie: Babydoll; Costume de baie întregi; Accesorii pentru sutiene; Sutiene; Maiouri lenjerie; Corsete și bustiere; Ciorapi; Suspensoare; Accesorii lenjerie; Seturi de lenjerie; Jupoane și pantaloni cu picior; Lenjerie modelatoare; Lenjerie intimă pentru femei; Bluze de corp pentru femei; Furouri pentru femei
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Εσώρουχα: Babydoll; Κορμάκια; Αξεσουάρ για σουτιέν; Σουτιέν; Μπλουζάκια καμισόλ; Κορσέδες και μπουστιέ; Κάλτσες (Hosiery); Jock Straps; Αξεσουάρ εσωρούχων; Σετ εσωρούχων; Petticoats & Pettipants (Μεσοφόρια); Shapewear; Γυναικεία σλιπ; Γυναικεία εσώρουχα; Γυναικεία εσώρουχα Σλιπ
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Дамско бельо: Къси прозрачни нощници; Бодита; Аксесоари за сутиени; Сутиени; Камизоли; Корсети и бюстиета; Чорапи и чорапогащници; Дамски бандажи; Аксесоари за дамско бельо; Комплекти бельо; Фусти и кюлоти; Оформящо облекло; Дамски долни гащи; Дамски долни дрехи; Дамски комбинезони
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Žensko donje rublje: Babydoll spavaćice; Bodiji; Dodaci za grudnjak; Grudnjaci; Potkošulje s tankim naramenicama; Korzeti i bustieri; Čarape; Jockstrap gaće; Dodaci za žensko donje rublje; Kompleti donjeg rublja; Podsuknje i pothlače; Odjeća za oblikovanje; Donji dijelovi donjeg rublja za žene; Ženske potkošulje; Ženske pothaljine
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Fehérneműk: Babydollok; Body-k; Melltartó-kiegészítők; Melltartók; Topok; Fűzők és míderek; Harisnyák; Szuszpenzorok; Fehérnemű-kiegészítők; Fehérneműszettek; Alsószoknyák és szoknya alatti nadrágok; Alakformáló ruházat; Női alsónadrágok; Női atléták; Női alsóneműk
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Lingerie: Babydoll; Body; Accessori per reggiseni; Reggiseni; Camicie da notte a canottiere; Corsetti e bustini; Calzetteria; Sospensori; Accessori lingerie; Completi intimi; Sottogonne e sottopantaloni; Indumenti modellanti; Mutande da donna; Magliette intime da donna; Slip intimi da donna
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Lingerie: Babydolls; Macacões; Acessórios para sutiã; Sutiãs; Regatas; Corsets e corseletes; Meias-calças; Protetores genitais; Acessórios de lingerie; Conjuntos de lingerie; Anáguas; Cinta modeladora; Roupas de baixo femininas; Segundas peles femininas; Combinações de roupas de baixo femininas
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Lingerie: Nuisettes; Bodies; Accessoires pour soutien-gorge; Soutiens-gorges; Caracos; Corsets et bustiers; Bas et collants; Slips de sport; Accessoires de lingerie; Ensembles de lingerie; Jupons et jupons-culottes; Sous-vêtements gainants; Sous-vêtements pour femme; Maillots de corps pour femme; Slips de sous-vêtements pour femme
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Apatinis trikotažas: Mini ilgio pūsti; Bodžiukai; Liemenėlių priedai; Liemenėlės; Berankovės palaidinės; Korsetai ir bustjė; Kojinės; Bandažai; Apatinio trikotažo priedai; Apatinio trikotažo komplektai; Pasijoniai ir apatinės kelnės; Formuojantys drabužiai; Moteriškos kelnaitės; Moteriški apatiniai marškinėliai; Moteriški apatinukai
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Lingerie: Babydolls; Bodysuits; Accessoires voor bh's; Bh's; Camisoles; Korsetten en bustiers; Panty's; Jockstraps; Accessoires voor lingerie; Lingeriesets; Petticoats en pettipants; Corrigerende kleding; Damesonderbroeken; Damesondershirts; Damesslips
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Bielizny: Babydoll; Body; Dodatki do biustonoszy; Biustonosze; Krótkie koszulki na ramiączkach; Gorsety i bustiery; Wyroby pończosznicze; Suspensoria; Dodatki do bielizny; Komplety bielizny; Halki i reformy; Bielizna modelująca; Majtki damskie; Podkoszulki damskie; Halki do bielizny damskiej
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 女用貼身衣物: 娃娃裝睡衣; 連身衣; 胸罩配件; 胸罩; 吊帶背心; 馬甲與束腹; 長襪/褲襪; 後空提臀內褲; 貼身衣物配件; 內衣套裝; 襯裙/褲; 塑身衣; 女用內衣褲; 女用汗衫; 女用緊身內褲
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > ランジェリー: ベビードール; ボディスーツ; ブラジャー小物; ブラジャー; キャミソール; コルセット＆ビスチェ; ストッキング・タイツ; 各種ジョックストラップ; ランジェリー小物; ランジェリーセット; ペチコート; 補正下着; 女性用アンダーパンツ; 女性用アンダーシャツ; 女性用下着スリップ
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > ชุดชั้นใน: ชุดนอนเบบี้ดอลล์; บอดี้สูท; อุปกรณ์บรา; ยกทรง; เสื้อสายเดี่ยว; คอร์เซ็ตและบัสเตียร์; ถุงน่องชั้นใน; กระจับหุ้ม; อุปกรณ์เสื้อผ้าชั้นในสตรี; เซ็ตชุดชั้นใน; กระโปรงชั้นในและกางเกงชั้นใน; ชุดกระชับส่วน; กางเกงชั้นในสำหรับผู้หญิง; เสื้อชั้นในสำหรับผู้หญิง; กางเกงซับในสำหรับผู้หญิง